Louisiana, session 2026, HB1213.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:383(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
32:383(A)(5) and (6) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§383. Loads on vehicles; care required thereto; penalties; definition
A.(1)(a) The load on a vehicle shall not drop, sift, leak, or otherwise escape
therefrom, except that sand may be dropped on a highway to secure traction or a
liquid substance may be dropped on a highway to clean or maintain such highway.
A vehicle shall not be driven on a highway unless constructed and loaded to prevent
contents from escaping. Vehicles shall have no openings that allow escape of
material, and closures shall be secured.
(b) The following vehicles shall be exempt from the provisions of
Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph:
(i) Authorized maintenance vehicles while in performance of official duties
related to emergencies or weather operations.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2302 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1213
(ii) Vehicles that drop incidental agriculture residue or incidental sugarcane
harvest residue that does not create a hazard.
(c) Any person who loads or unloads a vehicle with knowledge that it will
be operated upon a highway, where the loading or unloading causes a violation,
constitutes prima facie evidence of liability.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any person
who willfully and knowingly violates this Subsection shall be deemed guilty of a
misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not more than two
hundred fifty dollars for each violation. For sugarcane harvest vehicles, corrective
action shall be prioritized when violations result from unavoidable field conditions.
* * *
(5) Proof of actual spillage is not required to establish a violation.
(6) The office of state police, in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act, may adopt all rules as necessary to implement the provisions of this
Subsection.
* * *